Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 1 General Provisions
“Historic mansion house site” means the buildings and grounds of a historic mansion house, located in any county having a metropolitan form of government, included in the Tennessee register of historic places, and operated by the Association for the Preservation of Tennessee Antiquities, and including Association for the Preservation of Tennessee Antiquities sites owned by this state. “Historic mansion house site” also means the buildings and grounds of an historic mansion house located in any county having a metropolitan form of government which has been conveyed by this state in trust to a board of trustees created and appointed in accordance with §§4-13-103 and4-13-104, and for admission to which reasonable fees are charged as provided in §4-13-105. This subdivision (19) shall apply only to counties having a population of four hundred fifty thousand (450,000) or greater, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent census;

(A) “Historic performing arts center” means a facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

The center is located in a restored theater that is at least fifty (50) years old and listed on the national register of historic places;

The center is operated by a for-profit corporation, or not-for-profit corporation which is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)), as amended, where no member or officer, agent or employee of any historic performing arts center shall be paid, or directly or indirectly receive, in the form of salary or other compensation any profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages beyond the amount of such salary as may be fixed by its governing body for the reasonable performance of their assigned duties. All profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages by a not-for-profit corporation shall be used for the operation and maintenance of the historic performing arts center, and in furtherance of the purposes of the organization. All profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages by a for-profit corporation shall be used for the operation, renovation, refurbishing, and maintenance of the center;

The center provides facilities for programs of cultural, civic, and educational interest, including, but not limited to, stage plays, musical concerts, films, dance performances, receptions, exhibitions, seminars or meetings; and

The center is located in any county having a population of:

“Historic performing arts center” also means a facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

The center is located in a restored theater or music hall that is at least fifty (50) years old and listed on the national register of historic places;

The center is operated by a for-profit organization, or a not-for-profit organization that is exempt from taxation under § 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)), as amended, and where no member, officer, agent or employee of the not-for-profit organization receives any incentive compensation relating directly to the sale of alcoholic beverages beyond the amount of such salary and other compensation as may be fixed by the not-for-profit organization's governing body for the reasonable performance of such member's, officer's, agent's or employee's assigned duties. A portion of the profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages at the center shall be used for the operation, renovation, refurbishing or general maintenance of the center. Alcoholic beverages shall only be sold at the center before, during or after performances. Alcoholic beverages may be consumed inside the center at locations designated by its governing body;

The center provides facilities for programs of cultural, civic, and educational interest, including, but not limited to, stage plays, musical concerts, films, dance performances, receptions, exhibitions, seminars or meetings; and

The center is located in any county having a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), which has a metropolitan form of government;

“Historic performing arts center” also means a facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Was opened in 1921;

Is on the national register of historic places;

Is located on Broad Street;

Provides programs of cultural, civic, and educational interest, including, but not limited to, operas and musical concerts;

Is owned by a municipal or county government, or nonprofit, tax exempt, charitable organization. Alcoholic beverages shall only be sold at the center before, during or after performances; and

Is located in any county having a population of not less than three hundred seven thousand eight hundred (307,800) nor more than three hundred seven thousand nine hundred (307,900), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Historic performing arts center” also means a facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Was opened in 1924;

Was originally designed as a municipal auditorium and all-purpose exhibition hall;

Is located on McCallie Avenue;

Is owned by a municipal or county government, or nonprofit, tax exempt, charitable organization. Alcoholic beverages shall only be sold at the center before, during or after performances;

Provides programs of cultural, civic, and educational interest, including, but not limited to, stage plays and musical concerts; and

Is located in any county having a population of not less than three hundred seven thousand eight hundred (307,800) nor more than three hundred seven thousand nine hundred (307,900), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Historic performing arts center” also means a facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Is on the national register of historic places;

Was built in 1937;

Is located on Main Street;

Is an entertainment venue for live performances, movies and other events. Alcoholic beverages shall only be sold at the center before, during or after the performances, movies or other events; and

Is located in any county having a population of not less than one hundred twenty-six thousand six hundred (126,600) nor more than one hundred twenty-six thousand seven hundred (126,700), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Historic performing arts center” also means a facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Was built in 1931;

Is on the national register of historic places;

Is maintained by a not-for-profit corporation which is exempt from taxation under § 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)), as amended;

Has an auditorium that seats more than seven hundred fifty (750) people;

Provides programs of cultural, civic, and educational interest, including, but not limited to, stage plays and musical concerts; and

Is located in any county having a population of not less than one hundred fifty-three thousand (153,000) nor more than one hundred fifty-three thousand one hundred (153,100), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Historic performing arts center” also means a facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

The center:

Is located adjacent to a restored theater that is at least fifty (50) years old and listed on the national register of historic places; and

Shares a plaza with such restored theater;

The center is operated by a for-profit corporation, or not-for-profit corporation which is exempt from taxation under § 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)), as amended, where no member or officer, agent or employee of any historic performing arts center shall be paid, or directly or indirectly receive, in the form of salary or other compensation any profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages beyond the amount of such salary as may be fixed by its governing body for the reasonable performance of their assigned duties. All profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages by a not-for-profit corporation shall be used for the operation and maintenance of the historic performing arts center, and in furtherance of the purposes of the organization. All profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages by a for-profit corporation shall be used for the operation, renovation, refurbishing, and maintenance of the center. Alcoholic beverages may be sold before, during, and after events or during intermissions in such events;

The center provides facilities for programs of cultural, civic, and educational interest to further the mission of the for-profit or not-for-profit corporation, including, but not limited to, stage plays, musical concerts, films, dance performances, receptions, exhibitions, seminars, or meetings; and

The center is located in a county having a population of more than nine hundred thousand (900,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

(A) “Hotel” (Motel) means every building or other structure kept, used, maintained, advertised and held out to the public to be a place where food is actually served and consumed and sleeping accommodations are offered for adequate pay to travelers and guests, whether transient, permanent, or residential, in which twenty (20) or more rooms are used for the sleeping accommodations of such guests and having one (1) or more public dining rooms, with adequate and sanitary kitchen and a seating capacity of at least fifty (50) at tables, where meals are regularly served to such guests, such sleeping accommodations and dining rooms being conducted in the same building or in separate buildings or structures used in connection therewith that are on the same premises and are a part of the hotel operation. Motels meeting the qualifications set out herein for hotels shall be classified in the same category as hotels. Hotels shall have the privilege of granting franchises for the operation of a restaurant on their premises and the holder of such franchise shall be included in the definition of “hotel” hereunder; and property contiguous to a hotel, except property located in any county having a population of not less than seventy-seven thousand seven hundred fifty (77,750) nor more than seventy-seven thousand seven hundred ninety (77,790), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, which is owned by the same entity as the hotel and operated by the same entity as the hotel, which property either serves travelers and guests other than as a separate commercial establishment or is operated as a major entertainment complex serving in excess of one million (1,000,000) persons per year;

“Hotel” also means and includes all entities previously described wherein sleeping accommodations are offered for adequate pay to travelers and guests, whether transient, permanent or residential, in which thirty (30) or more suites are used for sleeping accommodations of such guests and having eating facilities in each room for four (4) or more persons with an adequate and sanitary central kitchen from which meals are regularly prepared and served to guests in such suites. For the purpose of this section, “suite” is defined as a guest facility within a hotel where living, sleeping and dining are regularly provided for such guests within the individual units provided for guests. No such hotel or suite as defined in this subdivision (21)(B) shall be authorized to charge for, inhibit or otherwise interfere in any way with the rights of its guests or tenants to carry into rooms or suites rented by them their own bottles, packages or other containers of alcoholic beverages and/or to use or serve them to themselves, their own visitors or guests within the individual units rented or leased by them;

“Hotel” also includes facilities owned and operated by an individual or event-management organization which plans and coordinates all phases of any function for retreats by groups of persons having similar backgrounds or purposes, and which offers meeting and banquet facilities, dining services, recreation and leisure activities in facilities which include a dining inn with seating capacity of three hundred (300), and a complex which includes meeting and banquet facilities with a seating capacity of two hundred (200), overnight accommodations for at least forty (40), and a fifty (50) acre tract of land with picnic accommodations for at least four thousand (4,000), and a facility with seating capacity of four hundred (400). The scope of any license authorized by this subdivision (21)(C) includes picnic service on the grounds of the complex owned and operated by the licensee;

“Hotel” also includes a residence hotel located in the central business district of any municipality having a population of more than three hundred thousand (300,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census and having a common smoking room and lobby area;

(i) “Hotel” also includes a bed and breakfast establishment as defined in §68-14-502, where meals are regularly served to guests and where sleeping accommodations and dining facilities being conducted in the same buildings or structures used in connection therewith are on the same premises and are part of the hotel operation. The premises upon which such establishment is located shall be within the boundaries of a clearly defined arts district which is owned and operated by the same entity and having a common courtyard which is contiguous to all buildings and structures on the premises. The dining facilities, including beverages, may be served from an adequate and sanitary central kitchen and storage facility;

This subdivision (21)(E) applies in any municipality having a population in excess of one hundred fifty thousand (150,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

(i) “Hotel” also includes a bed and breakfast establishment as defined in §68-14-502, where meals are regularly served to guests and where sleeping accommodations and dining facilities being conducted in the same buildings or structures used in connection therewith are on the same premises and are part of the hotel operation. In such establishment there must be two (2) rooms for sleeping accommodations and a seating capacity of twenty-five (25) people at tables. The premises upon which such establishment is located shall have a business conference center;

Subdivision (21)(F)(i) applies in any county having a population of not less than eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Hotel” also includes a facility located in a county which contains a population of not less than eighty-five thousand nine hundred (85,900) nor more than eighty-six thousand one hundred sixty (86,160), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent census, which facility contains the following characteristics:

Contains at least forty (40) rooms for guest sleeping accommodations offered for adequate pay to travelers and guests;

Contains at least three (3) separate dining rooms with adequate sanitary kitchen facilities, either common or separate, where meals are regularly served to guests;

Is located on real property of at least one thousand fifty (1,050) acres, notwithstanding that such real property is not contiguous and may be divided by a public or private road;

Contains a swimming pool, hiking trails, and biking trails for use by registered guests;

Has access to the Double Branch Creek and tributaries, notwithstanding that such creek and tributaries are not contiguous and may be divided by a public or private road;

Has at least two thousand seven hundred sixteen (2,716) acres of land that has been placed in conservation easement;

Provides a full service spa for use by registered guests of the facility;

(i) “Hotel” also includes a facility that possesses the following characteristics:

Was built in 1917;

Is listed on the National Register of Historic Places;

Has at least twelve (12) rooms for guest sleeping accommodations with at least one (1) room being handicap accessible;

Has a dining area that seats at least one hundred sixty (160) people;

Has a music and entertainment venue that is at least two thousand nine hundred square feet (2,900 sq. ft.);

Has a two-acre meadow suitable for wedding ceremonies and other events; and

Is located in any county having a population of not less than thirty-seven thousand five hundred (37,500) nor more than thirty-seven thousand six hundred (37,600), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

A hotel under this subdivision (21)(G) must comply with all the requirements of this chapter and shall be subject to the restrictions imposed upon licenses other than §57-4-103;

(i) “Hotel” also means a facility that possesses all of the following characteristics:

Offers to the public:

Is owned by and located on the campus of a private institution of higher education located on at least ten thousand (10,000) acres; and

Is located in any county having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand two hundred (39,200) nor more than thirty-nine thousand three hundred (39,300), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A hotel under this subdivision (21)(H) must comply with all the requirements of this chapter and shall be subject to the restrictions imposed upon licenses other than §57-4-103;

“Limited service restaurant” means a facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

(A) “Museum” means a building or institution serving as a repository of natural, scientific or literary curiosities or works of art for public display and further possesses the following characteristics:

The museum is at least fifty (50) years old; and

The museum is located in a county having a population in excess of seven hundred thousand (700,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Paddlewheel steamboat company” means a company that operates one (1) or more paddlewheel steamboats for hire in interstate commerce upon navigable waterways and is licensed by the United States coast guard to carry not less than one hundred (100) passengers on a single vessel, with adequate facilities and equipment for serving regular meals, on regular schedules, or charter trips, while moving through or docked in any county of the state; provided, however, that no paddlewheel steamboat company licensed pursuant to this chapter shall sell any type of alcoholic beverage or beer while such paddlewheel steamboat is docked within the boundaries of any local government which has not approved the sale of alcoholic beverages pursuant to §57-4-103;

“Passenger train” includes any passenger train operating in interstate commerce under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the appropriate federal or state agency, with adequate facilities and equipment for serving passengers, on regular or special schedules, or charter trips, while moving through any county of the state, but not while any such passenger train is stopped in a county or municipality that has not legalized such sales;

A “premier type tourist resort” means:

(A) “Premises,” when:

Referring to an establishment licensed under this chapter;

Such establishment is located within an historical district which has been designated as a national historic landmark;

Such national historic landmark centers around a historic public street or right-of-way;

Such a public street or right-of-way is closed to motor vehicular traffic, whether permanently or on a regular basis; and

But only to the extent that such premises are located and fronting upon such historic street and not located on or fronting upon another street or right-of-way within such national historic landmark;

“Public aquarium” means a facility which contains a collection of living aquatic animals whose sole or primary habitat is water and which facility provides for care and housing for public exhibition, and also possesses the following characteristics:

(A) “Retirement center” means a facility that contains each of the following characteristics:

The center is located in a county having a population of not less than one hundred twenty-six thousand six hundred (126,600) nor more than one hundred twenty-six thousand seven hundred (126,700), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

The center is located on a single parcel of land not less than forty eight (48) acres and not more than forty-nine (49) acres in area;

The center will consist of individual living unit apartments, individual living unit villas, an assisted living facility, a nursing home facility, a club house and common areas;

The center will have a club house that houses a health club, game room, lounge and a dining facility;

The center's lounge in the club house will offer to the center's residents and their guests only food, nonalcoholic beverages, mixed alcoholic drinks, wine and beer, as well as make available in the dining facility and other areas within the center's property, for the center's residents and guests only, mixed alcoholic drinks, wine and beer; and

“Special historic district” means any area with specific boundaries that possesses the following characteristics:

“Wine” means the product of the normal alcoholic fermentation of the juice of fresh, sound, ripe grapes, with the usual cellar treatment and necessary additions to correct defects due to climatic, saccharine and seasonal conditions, including champagne, sparkling and fortified wine of an alcoholic content not to exceed twenty-one percent (21%) by volume. No other product shall be called “wine” unless designated by appropriate prefixes descriptive of the fruit or other product from which the same was predominantly produced, or an artificial or imitation wine; and

(A) “Zoological institution” means a facility which contains a zoological garden or collection of living animals and provides for their care and housing for public exhibition and further possesses the following characteristics:

The zoo is owned, operated, or leased by a municipal or county government;

The zoo is at least fifty (50) years old; and

The zoo is located in a county having a population in excess of seven hundred thousand (700,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1967, ch. 211, § 1; 1972, ch. 682, § 2; 1972, ch. 756, § 3; 1975, ch. 111, § 3; 1975, ch. 347, § 1; 1979, ch. 401, § 2; T.C.A., § 57-153; Acts 1980, ch. 895, § 1; 1980, ch. 898, § 2; 1981, ch. 404, § 2; 1981, ch. 467, §§ 1-4; 1981, ch. 475, § 2; 1982, ch. 691, § 1; 1982, ch. 931, §§ 1-4; 1983, ch. 52, § 2; 1983, ch. 300, §§ 3, 6; 1983, ch. 305, § 1; 1983, ch. 306, § 1; 1983, ch. 391, § 1; 1983, ch. 454, § 4; 1983, ch. 461, §§ 1-4; 1983, ch. 469, § 2; 1983, ch. 481, § 1; 1984, ch. 522, § 1; 1984, ch. 569, § 2; 1984, ch. 599, § 1; 1984, ch. 858, §§ 1-4; 1984, ch. 871, § 1; 1984, ch. 975, § 2; 1985, ch. 41, § 1; 1985, ch. 47, § 1; 1985, ch. 117, § 1; 1985, ch. 190, § 2; 1986, ch. 516, § 1; 1986, ch. 899, § 3; 1987, ch. 73, § 1; 1987, ch. 218, § 1; 1987, ch. 444, §§ 3, 4; 1987, ch. 456, § 1; 1988, ch. 792, § 1; 1988, ch. 942, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 50, § 1; 1989, ch. 361, § 1; 1989, ch. 459, § 1; 1990, ch. 718, § 1; 1990, ch. 730, §§ 1, 2; 1990, ch. 853, § 1; 1990, ch. 949, § 1; 1991, ch. 462, § 1; 1992, ch. 674, § 2; 1992, ch. 675, § 2; 1993, ch. 308, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 657, § 1; 1994, ch. 822, § 1; 1994, ch. 837, § 1; 1994, ch. 933, § 1; 1995, ch. 18, § 1; 1995, ch. 306, § 2; 1996, ch. 688, § 1; 1996, ch. 730, § 1; 1996, ch. 749, § 2; 1996, ch. 1017, § 1; 1997, ch. 146, § 1; 1997, ch. 281, §§ 1-7; 1998, ch. 722, § 1; 1998, ch. 786, § 1; 1998, ch. 795, § 6; 1998, ch. 798, § 1; 1998, ch. 939, §§ 2, 3; 1998, ch. 966, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 211, § 1; 1999, ch. 314, §§ 1, 2, 4; 1999, ch. 525, § 2; 2000, ch. 657, § 2; 2000, ch. 727, § 1; 2001, ch. 64, § 2; 2001, ch. 74, § 1; 2001, ch. 84, § 1; 2001, ch. 112, §§ 1-3; 2001, ch. 371, § 2; 2001, ch. 383, §§ 2, 3; 2002, ch. 647, § 1; 2002, ch. 661, § 1; 2002, ch. 676, § 1; 2002, ch. 679, §§ 1, 2; 2002, ch. 705, §§ 1, 2; 2002, ch. 832, §§ 1, 3, 4; 2003, ch. 132, § 1; 2003, ch. 309, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 314, § 1; 2004, ch. 544, § 1; 2004, ch. 671, §§ 1, 2; 2004, ch. 676, § 1; 2004, ch. 710, § 1; 2004, ch. 857, § 1; 2004, ch. 876, § 6; 2005, ch. 212, § 5; 2005, ch. 253, § 2; 2005, ch. 422, §§ 1-10; 2006, ch. 612, §§ 1-3; 2006, ch. 733, §§ 1-6, 8; 2006, ch. 865, § 1; 2007, ch. 150, §§ 1-3; 2007, ch. 203, § 1; 2007, ch. 258, § 1; 2007, ch. 342, § 1; 2007, ch. 492, § 1; 2008, ch. 634, § 2; 2008, ch. 649, § 1; 2008, ch. 653, § 1; 2008, ch. 713, § 1; 2008, ch. 784, § 1; 2009, ch. 49, § 1; 2009, ch. 98, § 1; 2009, ch. 109, § 1; 2009, ch. 168, § 1; 2009, ch. 266, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 357, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 572, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 622, § 1; 2010, ch. 623, § 1; 2010, ch. 632, § 1; 2010, ch. 641, § 1; 2010, ch. 647, § 1; 2010, ch. 649, § 1; 2010, ch. 664, § 1; 2010, ch. 695, § 1; 2010, ch. 744, § 1; 2010, ch. 763, §§ 1-3; 2010, ch. 771, § 1; 2010, ch. 835, §§ 1-5; 2010, ch. 927, §§ 2, 3; 2010, ch. 1121, §§ 1-3; 2010, ch. 1133, §§ 2, 3; 2011, ch. 31, § 1; 2011, ch. 53, § 1; 2011, ch. 110, § 1; 2011, ch. 136, § 1; 2011, ch. 440, § 1; 2011, ch. 447, §§ 3-8, 11, 12; 2011, ch. 503, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 661, § 1; 2012, ch. 790, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 947, § 8; 2012, ch. 1005, §§ 1-3; 2012, ch. 1035, §§ 3, 4; 2012, ch. 1045, § 1; 2013, ch. 37, § 1; 2013, ch. 160, § 1; 2013, ch. 218, § 1; 2013, ch. 230, § 1; 2013, ch. 295, §§ 1, 2; 2013, ch. 371, § 1; 2013, ch. 458, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 506, § 1; 2014, ch. 643, §§ 1-4; 2014, ch. 661, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 843, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 861, § 7; 2014, ch. 907, §§ 1, 3, 4; 2014, ch. 1001, §§ 1-5, 8, 10; 2015, ch. 70, § 1; 2015, ch. 116, § 1; 2015, ch. 119, § 1; 2015, ch. 269, § 4; 2015, ch. 279, § 1; 2015, ch. 336, §§ 2, 3; 2015, ch. 391, §§ 2, 3; 2015, ch. 428, § 2; 2015, ch. 446, § 1; 2015, ch. 458, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2016, ch. 858, § 17; 2016, ch. 874, § 1; 2016, ch. 922, §§ 1-4; 2016, ch. 953, §§ 1-3; 2016, ch. 964, § 1; 2016, ch. 965, §§ 1, 2; 2016, ch. 1022, § 1; 2017, ch. 119, § 1; 2017, ch. 141, § 1; 2017, ch. 142, § 1; 2017, ch. 147, §§ 9-11; 2017, ch. 160, § 1; 2017, ch. 173, § 1; 2017, ch. 195, § 1; 2017, ch. 214, §§ 1-3; 2017, ch. 223, § 1. 2017, ch. 273, § 1; 2017, ch. 337, § 1; 2017, ch. 371, § 1; 2017, ch. 394, § 1; 2017, ch. 428, § 1; 2018, ch. 680, §§ 1, 2; 2018, ch. 740, §§ 1-4; 2018, ch. 755, § 4; 2018, ch. 785, § 1; 2018, ch. 787, § 1; 2018, ch. 812, § 1; 2018, ch. 847, § 1; 2018, ch. 860, §§ 1-3; 2018, ch. 912, § 1; 2018, ch. 950, §§ 1, 2; 2018, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2019, ch. 91, § 1; 2019, ch. 99, § 1; 2019, ch. 363, §§ 1-10; 2019, ch. 377, §§ 1, 2; 2019, ch. 435, §§ 2, 5; 2020, ch. 677, § 1; 2020, ch. 700, § 1; 2020, ch. 797, § 1; 2020, ch. 802, §§ 1–18.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 1994, ch. 550, § 2 purported to add the following language after the second sentence in (18): “Provided, further, when the public street within the Beale Street National Historic Landmark District is closed to motor vehicular traffic.”

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2005, ch. 212, § 6 provided that:

“(a) The commissioner of revenue shall promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the provisions of this act.

“(b) The commissioner of economic and community development shall promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the provisions of this act.

“(c) The executive director of the alcoholic beverage commission shall promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the provisions of this act.

“(d) All such rules and regulation shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.”

Acts 2009, ch. 168, § 2 provided that for purposes of §57-4-301, the annual taxes imposed for an historic inn shall be equal to the tax assessed for an historic mansion house site.

Pursuant to Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Tennessee, Acts 2014, ch. 843 took effect on April 28, 2014.

Acts 2018, ch. 755 contained two act sections 4. One of which amended this section and the other was the effective date provision.

Acts 2018 ch. 950, § 1 purported to amend the definition of “premier type tourist resort” with provisions exactly the same as the provisions by Acts 2018, ch. 860, § 3; therefore, the amendments to this section by ch. 950, § 1 were not given effect.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment by ch. 680 added (WWWW) and (XXXX) in the definition of “premier type tourist resort”.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 740 added (B) in the definition of “bed and breakfast establishment”; and added (YYYY), (ZZZZ), (AAAAA) and (BBBBB) in the definition of “premier type tourist resort”.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 755 added the definition of “festival operator”.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 785 added (CCCCC) in the definition of “premier type tourist resort”.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 787 added (DDDDD) in the definition of “premier type tourist resort”.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 812 added (P) in the definition of “urban park center”.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 847 added (EEEEE) and (FFFFF) in the definition of “premier type tourist resort”.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 860 added (GGGGG)-(IIIII) in the definition of “premiere type tourist resort”.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 912 added (JJJJJ) and (KKKKK) in the definition of “premiere type tourist resort”.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 950 added (LLLLL) in the definition of “premiere type tourist resort”.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 1010 added (C) and (D) in the definition of “Sports authority facility”.

The 2019 amendment by ch. 91 added (MMMMM) to the definition of “premier type tourist resort”.

The 2019 amendment by ch. 99 added (E) to the definition of “sports authority facility”.

The 2019 amendment by ch. 363 added (NNNNN) through (RRRRR) to the definition of “premier type tourist resort”; added (I) and (J) to the definition of “community theater”; added (31)(B) to the definition of “retirement center”; added (L) to the definition of “restaurant”; and added (Q) to the definition of “urban park center”.

The 2019 amendment by ch. 377, in the definition of “premises”, in (A)(iii), deleted “a” preceding “national”, and inserted “historic”, inserted “, whether permanently or” in (A)(iv), and added (A)(v); and, in the definition of “restaurant” rewrote (C).

The 2019 amendment by ch. 435, in the definition of “premises”, added the fourth sentence in the undesignated paragraph of (A) and inserted “, or a manufacturer exercising the rights granted to it under §57-3-202(i)(1)” in (28)(C)(i).

The 2020 amendment by ch. 677 added (8)(N) in the definition of “club”.

The 2020 amendment by ch. 700 added (39)(R) in the definition of “urban park center”.

The 2020 amendment, by ch. 797, added (F) in the definition of “sports authority facility”.

The 2020 amendment by ch. 802, in (11), rewrote the former second sentence and deleted the former last sentence in the definition of “commercial passenger boat company”, of which the two sentences read: “Such company shall operate out of any county that has a population in excess of two hundred eighty-five thousand (285,000) or not less than eighty-three thousand three hundred (83,300) nor more than eighty-three thousand four hundred (83,400), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census. No commercial passenger boat company licensed pursuant to this chapter shall sell any type of alcoholic beverage or beer while such boat is docked within the boundaries of any local government which has not approved the sale of alcoholic beverages pursuant to §57-4-103;”; added (13)(K) in the definition of “community theater”; added (27)(SSSSS) through (MMMMMM), in the definition of “premier type tourist resort”; and added (34)(G) in the definition of “sports authority facility”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 680, § 3. April 12, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 740, § 5. April 18, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 755, § 4. April 18, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 785, § 2. April 20, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 787, § 2. April 20, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 812, § 2. July 1, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 847, § 2. April 26, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 860, § 4. May 3, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 912, § 2. May 1, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 950, § 3. May 15, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 1010, § 4. May 21, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 91, § 2. March 28, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 99, § 2. April 8, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 363, § 11. May 10, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 377, § 4. May 10, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 435, § 6. May 22, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 677, § 2, June 15, 2020.

Acts 2020, ch. 700, § 2, June 22, 2020.

Acts 2020, ch. 797, § 2. July 15, 2020.

Acts 2020, ch. 802, § 19. July 15, 2020.

Cross-References. Certain 1987 amendments to section inapplicable to certain counties, §57-4-104.

Limitation on selling or giving away alcoholic or malt beverages during certain hours, §57-4-203.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. Discrimination, OAG 89-73 (5/3/89).

Premiere type tourist resorts, licenses, OAG 94-81 (7/22/94).

Nashville and Davidson County arena within definition of “convention center,” OAG 95-016 (3/16/95).

Implementation of Tennessee River Resort District Act, OAG 05-161 (10/18/05).

Licensing and taxation of hotels selling alcohol for consumption on the premises. OAG 16-05, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 3 (2/9/2016).